Arkansas, session 2025, HB1953.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that the Secretary of the Department of
Corrections may add a surcharge to all inmate calls to offset the cost of
equipment and operations for security needs associated with inmate
communications.
(b) The General Assembly intends:
(1) The department to assess a surcharge on inmate calls to be
used to pay for certain expenses to offset the cost of security needs
associated with inmate communications; and
(2) To authorize a county sheriff in charge of a county jail to
assess a surcharge on inmate calls to offset the cost of security needs
associated with inmate communications.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 12-27-128, concerning the Division of
*CEB264*
04/01/2025 1:17:40 PM CEB264

HB1953
Correction Nontax Revenue Receipts Fund, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(d)(1) Moneys collected under § 12-29-119 shall be used only to offset
the cost of security needs associated with inmate communications.
(2) The Board of Corrections shall set guidelines for the
authorized uses of the moneys described in subdivision (d)(1) of this
section.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 12-29-119 is amended to read as follows:
12-29-119. Inmate telephone calls.
(a) For an inmate making an intrastate telephone call from a Division
of Correction facility or Division of Community Correction facility:
(1) The cost per minute shall not be more than the maximum cost
per minute of an interstate inmate telephone call as determined by the
Federal Communications Commission as of January 1, 2021; and
(2) Ancillary service charges shall not be permitted except an
ancillary service charge of a type and up to an amount authorized by the
Federal Communications Commission for an interstate inmate telephone call as
of January 1, 2021.
(b)(1)(A) The Department of Corrections shall assess a surcharge on
each inmate telephone and video call to offset the cost of security needs
associated with inmate communications.
(B) The surcharge shall be added to the cost per telephone
and video call, collected by the vendor providing inmate communication
services, and deposited into the Division of Correction Nontax Revenue
Receipts Fund monthly.
(2) The amount of the surcharge shall be determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State after consultation with Arkansas Legislative
Audit and the Division of Correction and upon approval by the Governor.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 12-41-105, concerning commissions from
inmate telephone services and profits from inmate commissary services, is
amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(e)(1)(A) A county sheriff may assess a surcharge in an amount
described in subdivision (e)(2) of this section on each inmate telephone and
video call to offset the cost of security needs associated with inmate
04/01/2025 1:17:40 PM CEB264

HB1953
communications.
(B) If assessed, the surcharge shall be added to the cost
per telephone and video call, collected by the vendor providing inmate
communication services, and credited to the county sheriff’s office
communications facility and equipment fund monthly.
(2) The amount of the surcharge shall be determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the state, after consultation with Arkansas Legislative
Audit and the Association of Arkansas Counties and upon approval by the
Governor.



























04/01/2025 1:17:40 PM CEB264